Utah statutes.
76-5-306.   Lesser included offenses.

In this part, the following offenses are lesser included offenses of Section 76-5-302, aggravated kidnapping:

(1)  Section 76-5-301, kidnapping; and

(2)  Section 76-5-304, unlawful detention.

